Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6166.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 32b. (1) "Moped" means a 2- or 3-wheeled vehicle to which both of the following apply:that meets the following requirements: (a) It is equipped with a motor that does not exceed 100 cubic centimeters piston displacement and cannot propel the vehicle at a speed greater than 30 miles per hour on a level surface. (b) Its power drive system does not require the operator to shift gears. (a) It is designed to travel with 3 or fewer wheels in contact with the ground. (b) It has a seat. (c) It is not capable of exceeding 30 miles per hour. (2) Moped does not include an any class of electric bicycle. Sec. 33. "Motor vehicle" means every vehicle that is self-propelled, but for purposes of chapter 4, motor vehicle does not include industrial equipment such as a forklift, a front-end loader, or other construction equipment that is not subject to registration under this act. Motor vehicle does not include a power-driven mobility device when that power-driven mobility device is being used by an individual with a mobility disability. Motor vehicle does not include an electric patrol vehicle being operated in compliance with the electric patrol vehicle act, 1997 PA 55, MCL 257.1571 to 257.1577. Motor vehicle does not include an electric personal assistive mobility device or micromobility device. Motor vehicle does not include an electric carriage. Motor vehicle does not include a commercial quadricycle. Motor vehicle does not include an electric bicycle. Motor vehicle does not include an electric skateboard. Sec. 312a. (1) An individual, before operating a motorcycle, other than an autocycle, upon on a public street or highway in this state, shall procure a motorcycle indorsement endorsement on his or her the individual's operator's or chauffeur's license. The license must be issued, suspended, revoked, canceled, or renewed in accordance with and governed by this act. (2) An individual, before operating a moped upon on a highway, shall procure a special restricted license to operate a moped unless the individual has a valid operator's or chauffeur's license. A special restricted license to operate a moped may be issued to an individual 15 years of age or older if the individual satisfies the secretary of state that he or she the individual is competent to operate a moped with safety. The secretary of state shall not require a road test before issuance of a special restricted license to operate a moped. (3) A An individual who is less than 18 years of age must obtain a special restricted license to operate a moped, class 2 electric bicycle, class 3 electric bicycle, or micromobility device with more than 500 watts of power or that has a maximum speed of more than 20 miles per hour. A special restricted license issued under this subsection expires on the birthday of the individual it is issued to in the fourth year following the date of issuance. A license must not be issued for a period longer than 4 years. An individual issued a license to operate a moped, class 2 electric bicycle, class 3 electric bicycle, or micromobility device with more than 500 watts of power or that has a maximum speed of more than 20 miles per hour, shall pay $7.50 for an original license and $6.00 for a renewal license. The money received and collected under this subsection must be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the general fund. The secretary of state shall refund out of the fees collected to each county or municipality, acting as an examining officer, $2.50 for each applicant examined for an original license and $1.00 for a renewal license. (4) An individual who violates subsection (1) is responsible for a civil infraction or guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as follows: (a) For a first violation, the individual is responsible for a civil infraction and shall be ordered to pay a civil fine of not more than $250.00. (b) For a violation that occurs after 1 or more prior judgments, the individual is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $500.00, or both. (5) An individual who is less than 18 years of age, before operating a class 2 electric bicycle or a class 3 electric bicycle on a roadway, shall procure a special restricted license to operate an electric bicycle, unless the individual has a valid operator's or chauffeur's license. A special restricted license to operate an electric bicycle may be issued to an individual 15 years of age or older if the individual satisfies the secretary of state that the individual is competent to operate an electric bicycle with safety. The secretary of state shall not require a road test before issuance of a special restricted license to operate an electric bicycle. (6) An individual who is less than 18 years of age, before operating a micromobility device with more than 500 watts of power or that has a maximum speed of more than 20 miles per hour on a roadway, shall procure a special restricted license to operate a micromobility device with more than 500 watts of power or that has a maximum speed of more than 20 miles per hour unless the individual has a valid operator's or chauffeur's license. A special restricted license to operate a micromobility device with more than 500 watts of power or that has a maximum speed of more than 20 miles per hour may be issued to an individual 15 years of age or older if the individual satisfies the secretary of state that the individual is competent to operate an electric scooter with more than 500 watts of power or that has a maximum speed of more than 20 miles per hour with safety. The secretary of state shall not require a road test before issuance of a special restricted license to operate a micromobility device with more than 500 watts of power or that has a maximum speed of 20 miles per hour. (7) The secretary of state shall waive the fee under subsection (6) for an individual with a permanent disability or temporary disability who applies to the secretary of state, on a form prescribed by the department, for a waiver of the fee. Sec. 657. Each person riding a bicycle, electric bicycle, electric personal assistive mobility device, electric skateboard, micromobility device, or moped or operating a low-speed vehicle or commercial quadricycle upon on a roadway has all of the rights and is subject to all of the duties applicable to the driver of a vehicle under this chapter, except for special regulations in this article and except for the provisions of this chapter that by their nature do not apply. Sec. 658. (1) A person propelling a bicycle or operating a motorcycle or moped shall not ride other than upon on and astride a permanent and regular seat attached to that vehicle. (2) A bicycle or motorcycle shall must not be used to carry more persons at 1 time than the number for which it is designed and equipped. (3) An electric personal assistive mobility device or an electric skateboard shall micromobility device must not be used to carry more than 1 person at a time. (4) A person less than 19 years of age operating a moped on a public thoroughfare shall wear a crash helmet on his or her their head. A person less than 19 years of age operating an electric skateboard shall wear a crash helmet on his or her head. Except as provided in subsection (5), a person operating or riding on a motorcycle shall wear a crash helmet on his or her their head. (5) The following conditions apply to a person 21 years of age or older operating or riding on a motorcycle, as applicable: (a) A person who is operating a motorcycle is not required to wear a crash helmet on his or her their head if he or she the person has had a motorcycle endorsement on his or her their operator's or chauffeur's license for not less than 2 years or the person passes a motorcycle safety course conducted under section 811a or 811b and satisfies the requirements of subdivision (c). (b) A person who is riding on a motorcycle is not required to wear a crash helmet on his or her their head if the person or the operator of the motorcycle satisfies the requirements of subdivision (c). (c) A person who is operating a motorcycle and a person who is riding on a motorcycle are not required to wear crash helmets on their heads if the operator of the motorcycle or the rider has in effect security for the first-party medical benefits payable in the event that he or she the person is involved in a motorcycle accident, as provided in section 3103 of the insurance code of 1956, 1956 PA 218, MCL 500.3103, in 1 of the following amounts, as applicable: (i) A motorcycle operator without a rider, not less than $20,000.00. (ii) A motorcycle operator with a rider, not less than $20,000.00 per person per occurrence. However, if the rider has security in an amount not less than $20,000.00, then the operator is only required to have security in the amount of not less than $20,000.00. (6) Crash helmets shall be approved by the department of state police. The department of state police shall promulgate rules for the implementation of this section under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. Rules in effect on June 1, 1970, apply to helmets required by this act. (7) The crash helmet requirements under this section do not apply to a person operating or riding in an autocycle if the vehicle is equipped with a roof that meets or exceeds standards for a crash helmet. (8) A person operating or riding in an autocycle shall wear seat belts when on a public highway in this state. (9) A person under the age of 12 shall not operate an electric skateboard on a public highway or street. (9) A person less than 19 years of age operating a micromobility device on a public thoroughfare shall wear a properly fitted and fastened helmet on their head. Sec. 660. (1) A person operating an electric personal assistive mobility device, micromobility device, low-speed vehicle, electric skateboard, or moped upon on a roadway shall ride as near to the right side of the roadway as practicable, shall exercise due care when passing a standing vehicle or a vehicle proceeding in the same direction, and shall not block, delay, or otherwise interfere with the movement of a streetcar on a streetcar track. (2) A motorcycle is entitled to full use of a lane, and a motor vehicle must not be driven in such a manner as to deprive a motorcycle of the full use of a lane. This subsection does not apply to motorcycles operated 2 abreast in a single lane or to the operation of a motorcycle in a manner that blocks, delays, or otherwise interferes with the movement of a streetcar on a streetcar track. (3) A person riding an electric personal assistive mobility device, or micromobility device, motorcycle, electric skateboard, or moped upon on a roadway shall not ride more than 2 abreast except on a path or part of a roadway set aside for the exclusive use of those vehicles. (4) Where a usable and designated path for bicycles is provided adjacent to a highway or street, a person operating an electric personal assistive mobility device or electric skateboard micromobility device may, by local ordinance, be required to use that path. (5) A person operating a motorcycle, moped, low-speed vehicle, electric personal assistive mobility device, or electric skateboard micromobility device shall not pass between lines of traffic, but may pass on the left of traffic moving in his or her the person's direction in the case of a 2-way street or on the left or right of traffic in the case of a 1-way street, in an unoccupied lane. (6) A person operating an electric personal assistive mobility device or electric skateboard micromobility device on a sidewalk constructed for the use of pedestrians shall yield the right-of-way to a pedestrian and shall give an audible signal before overtaking and passing the pedestrian. (7) A moped, low-speed vehicle, or commercial quadricycle must not be operated on a sidewalk constructed for the use of pedestrians. (8) A low-speed vehicle or commercial quadricycle must not be operated at a speed of more than 25 miles per hour. A low-speed vehicle must not be operated on a highway or street with a speed limit of more than 35 miles per hour except for the purpose of crossing that highway or street. A commercial quadricycle must not be operated on a highway or street with a speed limit of more than 45 miles per hour except for the purpose of crossing that highway or street. An individual shall not operate a commercial quadricycle that is equipped with a motor unless he or she the person has a valid operator's license issued under this act. The state transportation department may prohibit the operation of a low-speed vehicle or commercial quadricycle on any highway or street under its jurisdiction if it determines that the prohibition is necessary in the interest of public safety. (9) This section does not apply to a police officer in the performance of his or her the police officer's official duties. (10) An electric personal assistive mobility device must not be operated at a speed of more than 15 miles per hour and must not be operated on a highway or street with a speed limit of more than 25 miles per hour except to cross that highway or street. (11) An electric skateboard A micromobility device must not be operated at a speed of more than 25 20 miles per hour. An electric skateboard that does not have handlebars must not be operated on a highway or street with a speed limit of more than 25 miles per hour except to cross that highway or street, and an electric skateboard equipped with handlebars must not be operated on a highway or street with a speed limit of more than 45 miles per hour except to cross that highway or street. (12) The governing body of a county, a city, a village, an entity created under the urban cooperation act of 1967, 1967 (Ex Sess) PA 7, MCL 124.501 to 124.512, or a township may, by ordinance based on the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens, regulate the operation of electric personal assistive mobility devices, electric skateboards, micromobility devices, or commercial quadricycles on sidewalks, highways or streets, or crosswalks. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a governing body of a county, city, village, entity created under the urban cooperation act of 1967, 1967 (Ex Sess) PA 7, MCL 124.501 to 124.512, or township may prohibit the operation of electric personal assistive mobility devices, electric skateboards micromobility devices, or commercial quadricycles in an area open to pedestrian traffic adjacent to a waterfront or on a trail under its jurisdiction, in a downtown or central business district, or on a street that includes streetcar tracks. Signs indicating the regulation must be conspicuously posted in the area where the use of an electric personal assistive mobility device, electric skateboard, micromobility device, or commercial quadricycle is regulated. (13) Operation of an electric personal assistive mobility device or electric skateboard micromobility device is prohibited in a special charter city and a state park under the jurisdiction of the Mackinac Island State Park commission. (14) Operation of an electric personal assistive mobility device or electric skateboard micromobility device may be prohibited in a historic district. (15) The department of natural resources may by order regulate the use of electric personal assistive mobility devices or electric skateboards micromobility devices on all lands under its control. Sec. 660d. (1) An individual may park a bicycle or an electric skateboard equipped with handlebars on a sidewalk except as prohibited by an official traffic control device. (2) An individual shall not park a bicycle or an electric skateboard equipped with handlebars on a sidewalk in such a manner that the bicycle or electric skateboard equipped with handlebars impedes the lawful movement of pedestrians or other traffic. (3) An individual may park a bicycle or an electric skateboard equipped with handlebars on a highway or street at any location where parking is allowed for motor vehicles, may park at any angle to the curb or the edge of the highway, and may park abreast of another bicycle. or electric skateboard equipped with handlebars. (4) An individual shall not park a bicycle or an electric skateboard equipped with handlebars on a highway or street in such a manner as to obstruct the movement of a legally parked motor vehicle or as to block, delay, or otherwise interfere with the movement of a streetcar on a streetcar track. (5) Except as otherwise provided in this section, an individual parking a bicycle or an electric skateboard equipped with handlebars on a highway or street shall do so in compliance with this act and any local ordinance. Sec. 661. A person operating a bicycle, electric personal assistive mobility device, micromobility device, moped, or motorcycle shall not carry any package, bundle, or article that prevents the driver from keeping both hands upon on the handlebars of the vehicle. Sec. 662. (1) A bicycle, electric personal assistive mobility device, electric skateboard, micromobility device, or commercial quadricycle being operated on a roadway between 1/2 hour after sunset and 1/2 hour before sunrise shall be equipped with a lamp on the front that emits a white light visible from a distance of at least 500 feet to the front and with a red reflector on the rear that shall be visible from all distances from 100 feet to 600 feet to the rear when directly in front of lawful lower beams of head lamps on a motor vehicle. A lamp emitting a red light visible from a distance of 500 feet to the rear may be used in addition to the red reflector. (2) A bicycle shall be equipped with a brake that enables the operator to make the braked wheels skid on dry, level, clean pavement. (3) An electric personal assistive mobility device, electric skateboard, micromobility device, or commercial quadricycle shall enable the operator to bring it to a controlled stop. (4) A person shall not sell, offer for sale, or deliver for sale in this state a bicycle or a pedal for use on a bicycle, either of which was manufactured after January 1, 1976, unless it is equipped with a type of reflex reflector located on the front and rear surfaces of the pedal. The reflector elements may be either integral with the construction of the pedal or mechanically attached, but shall be sufficiently recessed from the edge of the pedal, or of the reflector housing, to prevent contact of the reflector element with a flat surface placed in contact with the edge of the pedal. The pedal reflectors shall must be visible from the front and rear of the bicycle during the nighttime from a distance of 200 feet when directly exposed to the lower beam head lamps of a motor vehicle. (5) A person shall not sell, offer for sale, or deliver for sale in this state a bicycle manufactured after January 1, 1976 or an electric personal assistive mobility device or micromobility device unless it is equipped with either tires that have reflective sidewalls or with wide-angle prismatic spoke reflectors. If the bicycle, micromobility device, or the electric personal assistive mobility device is manufactured with reflective sidewalls, the reflective portion of the sidewall shall form a continuous circle on the sidewall, and may not be removed from the tire without removal of tire material. If the bicycle is equipped with wide-angle prismatic spoke reflectors, the reflectors of the front wheel shall be essentially colorless or amber, and the reflectors on the rear wheel shall be essentially colorless or red. Reflective sidewalls or spoke reflectors shall cause the bicycle to be visible from all distances from 100 feet to 600 feet when viewed under lawful low beam motor vehicle head lamps under normal atmospheric conditions. (6) A person who violates subsection (1) or (2) is responsible for a civil infraction. Sec. 662a. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, an individual riding an electric bicycle is subject to the same requirements under this act as an individual riding a bicycle. (2) Beginning on January 1, 2018, a A manufacturer or distributor of electric bicycles offered for sale or distribution in this state shall permanently affix in a prominent location on the electric bicycle a label that contains the classification number, top assisted speed, and motor wattage of the electric bicycle. The label required under this subsection shall be printed in Arial font and shall be at least 9-point type. (3) A person shall not tamper with or modify an electric bicycle so as to change the manufactured motor-powered speed capability or motor engagement of the electric bicycle without replacing the label required under subsection (2) with an appropriate label printed in Arial font and in at least 9-point type. For purposes of this act, a device shall not be considered an electric bicycle if the motor is modified in a manner that no longer meets the criteria described in section 13e, or if the motor exceeds 750 watts. (4) All of the following apply to a class 3 electric bicycle: (a) A class 3 electric bicycle shall not be operated by an individual less than 14 years of age. An individual less than 14 years of age may ride as a passenger on a class 3 electric bicycle that is designed to accommodate passengers. (b) An individual less than 18 years of age who operates or rides as a passenger on a class 3 electric bicycle shall wear a properly fitted and fastened bicycle helmet that meets federal standards established by the United States Consumer Product Safety Commission or the American Society for Testing and Materials. (5) An electric bicycle shall comply with applicable equipment and manufacturing requirements for electric bicycles established under federal law, including standards adopted by the United States Consumer Product Safety Commission and compiled in 16 CFR part 1512. (6) Subject to subsection (13), a local unit of government may enact an ordinance that prohibits the use of micromobility devices in its jurisdiction. (7) (6) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (7), (8), an individual may operate an electric bicycle on any part of a highway that is open to a bicycle, including, but not limited to, a lane designated for the exclusive use of bicycles and the shoulder. (8) (7) An individual shall not operate an electric bicycle within a city that prohibits the use of nonemergency motor vehicles, unless the city council of that city, by majority vote, adopts a resolution allowing the operation of electric bicycles within city limits. An individual shall not operate an electric bicycle within the Mackinac Island State Park, unless he or she the individual has obtained the required permit from the Mackinac Island State Park Commission created in part 767 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.76701 to 324.76709, or unless the Mackinac Island State Park Commission authorizes the operation of electric bicycles within its jurisdiction. If a city described in this subsection or the Mackinac Island State Park Commission authorizes the operation of electric bicycles within its jurisdiction, the city or the Mackinac Island State Park Commission may regulate the operation of electric bicycles within its jurisdiction. (9) (8) An individual may operate a class 1 electric bicycle on a linear trail that has an asphalt, crushed limestone, or similar surface, or a rail trail. A local authority or agency of this state having jurisdiction over a trail described in this subsection may regulate or prohibit the operation of a class 1 electric bicycle on that trail. (10) (9) An individual may operate a class 2 or class 3 electric bicycle on a linear trail that has an asphalt, crushed limestone, or similar surface, or a rail trail if authorized by the local authority or agency of this state having jurisdiction over the trail. (11) (10) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an individual shall not operate an electric bicycle on a trail that is designated as nonmotorized and that has a natural surface tread that is made by clearing and grading the native soil with no added surfacing materials. A local authority or agency of this state having jurisdiction over a trail described in this subsection may allow and regulate the operation of an electric bicycle on that trail. (12) (11) This state or a local authority or agency of this state shall administer the provisions of this section in a manner that complies with the Americans with disabilities act of 1990, Public Law 101-336, and the persons with disabilities civil rights act, 1976 PA 220, MCL 37.1101 to 37.1607. (13) (12) Before an entity described in subsections (7) (6) or (8) to (10) (11) may prohibit, authorize, or regulate the use of electric bicycles within its jurisdiction, that entity shall hold a public hearing on the matter. (14) (13) Subsections (6) to (10) (11) do not apply to the use of electric bicycles on a congressionally authorized public trail system. (15) An individual less than 18 years of age who operates or rides as a passenger on a class 2 electric bicycle shall wear a properly fitted and fastened bicycle helmet that meets federal standards established by the United States Consumer Product Safety Commission or the American Society for Testing and Materials. Enacting section 1. Section 13f of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.13f, is repealed. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S05968'25) or House Bill No. 6165 (request no. H05968'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.